Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 73
TRADEMARKS ON ARTICLES OR SUPPLIES - REGISTRATION

7-73-101 to 7-73-109. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article repealed, p. 24, § 22, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 4 of chapter 141, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2008, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.